Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.67, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7b. new text end new text begin Health care materials. new text end new text begin Health care materials are exempt. "Health care materials" means nondurable disposable health care materials prescribed by a physician that are primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose and generally not used by an individual in the absence of illness or injury and not used repeatedly by different individuals. For purposes of this subdivision, "prescribed" has the meaning given in subdivision 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.67, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7c. new text end new text begin Other purchases under health plans. new text end new text begin Items purchased in a transaction covered by a private health plan that are not already exempt under subdivision 7, 7a, or 7b are exempt. For purposes of this subdivision, "private health plan" means a health plan as defined in section 62A.011, subdivision 3; a health plan as defined in section 62V.02, subdivision 4; or a qualified health plan as defined in section 62A.011, subdivision 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end